Indiana, session 2026, HB1069.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 22-3-3-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.275-2013,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) After an injury and prior to an adjudication
of permanent impairment, the employer shall furnish or cause to be
furnished, is responsible for providing, free of charge to the
employee, an attending physician for the treatment of the employee's
injuries, and in addition thereto such the services and products as that
the attending physician or the worker's compensation board may deem
reasonably necessary. After June 30, 2026, the employee is entitled
to choose the attending physician that the employer is required to
provide, free of charge, regardless of whether the injury occurred
before July 1, 2026. If, due to the nature of the injury, the employee
is unable to select an attending physician or does not select an
attending physician and the nature of the injury requires
immediate treatment and care, the employer shall select an
attending physician for the employee as required or appropriate to
provide immediate treatment and care. The employer shall provide
2026 IN 1069—LS 6067/DI 153


or cause to be provided an attending physician during any time
that the employee has not chosen an attending physician. When
medically necessary or advisable, or at the request of the employee,
the attending physician shall consult with the employee's personal
physician. Notice that the employee has chosen an attending
physician and notice of the provision of services and products as
they occur shall be given to the employer and the employer's
insurance carrier as required under rules adopted by the worker's
compensation board. If the employee is requested or required by the
employer to submit to treatment outside the county of employment, the
employer shall also pay the reasonable expense of travel, food, and
lodging necessary during the travel, but not to exceed the amount paid
at the time of the travel by the state to its employees under the state
travel policies and procedures established by the department of
administration and approved by the state budget agency. If the
treatment or travel to or from the place of treatment causes a loss of
working time to the employee, the employer shall reimburse the
employee for the loss of wages using the basis of the employee's
average daily wage.
(b) During the period of temporary total disability resulting from the
injury, the employer shall furnish is responsible for providing to the
employee, free of charge, the physician, services, and products, and
the worker's compensation board may, on proper application of either
party, require that treatment by the physician and services and products
be furnished by or on behalf of the employer as the worker's
compensation board may deem reasonably necessary. After June 30,
2026, the employee is entitled to choose the physician and obtain
the services and products that the chosen physician or the worker's
compensation board deem reasonably necessary, free of charge,
regardless of whether the injury occurred before July 1, 2026. The
employer shall provide or cause to be provided an attending
physician during any time that the employee has not chosen an
attending physician. When medically necessary or advisable, or at
the request of the employee, the attending physician shall consult
with the employee's personal physician. Notice that the employee
has received physician services and products chosen by the
employee shall be given to the employer and the employer's
insurance carrier as required under the rules of the worker's
compensation board.
(c) After an employee's injury has been adjudicated by agreement
or award on the basis of permanent partial impairment and within the
statutory period for review in such case as provided in section 27 of
2026 IN 1069—LS 6067/DI 153


this chapter, the employer may continue to furnish provide to the
employee, free of charge, a physician or surgeon and other medical
services and products, and the worker's compensation board may within
the statutory period for review as provided in section 27 of this chapter,
on a proper application of either party, require that treatment by that
physician and other services and products be furnished by and on
behalf of the employer as the worker's compensation board may deem
necessary to limit or reduce the amount and extent of the employee's
impairment. If the employer chooses to continue providing a
physician or surgeon, after June 30, 2026, the employee is entitled
to choose the physician or surgeon and obtain the services and
products that the chosen physician or surgeon or the worker's
compensation board deem reasonably necessary, regardless of
whether the injury occurred before July 1, 2026. The employer
may provide or cause to be provided the physician or surgeon
during any time that the employee has not chosen an attending
physician. When medically necessary or advisable, or at the
request of the employee, the attending physician shall consult with
the employee's personal physician. Notice that the employee has
received physician or surgeon services and products chosen by the
employee shall be given to the employer and the employer's
insurance carrier as required under the rules of the worker's
compensation board. The refusal of the employee to accept such
services and products, when provided by or on behalf of the employer,
shall bar the employee from all compensation otherwise payable during
the period of the refusal, and the employee's right to prosecute any
proceeding under IC 22-3-2 through IC 22-3-6 shall be suspended and
abated until the employee's refusal ceases. The employee must be
served with a notice setting forth the consequences of the refusal under
this section. The notice must be in a form prescribed by the worker's
compensation board. No compensation for permanent total impairment,
permanent partial impairment, permanent disfigurement, or death shall
be paid or payable for that part or portion of the impairment,
disfigurement, or death which is the result of the failure of the
employee to accept the services and products required under this
section. However, an employer may at any time permit an employee to
have treatment for the employee's injuries by spiritual means or prayer
in lieu of the physician or surgeon and other services and products
required under this section.
(d) If, because of an emergency, or because of the employer's failure
to provide an attending physician or services and products, or treatment
by spiritual means or prayer, as required by this section, or because of
2026 IN 1069—LS 6067/DI 153


any other good reason, a physician other than that provided chosen by
the employee and not otherwise furnished by the employer treats the
injured employee during the period of the employee's temporary total
disability, or necessary and proper services and products are procured
within the period, the reasonable cost of those services and products
shall, subject to the approval of the worker's compensation board, be
paid by the employer.
(e) An employer or employer's insurance carrier may not delay the
provision of emergency medical care whenever emergency medical
care is considered necessary in the professional judgment of the
attending health care facility physician.
(f) Regardless of when it occurs, where a compensable injury results
in the amputation of a body part, the enucleation of an eye, or the loss
of natural teeth, the employer shall furnish an appropriate artificial
member, braces, and prosthodontics. The cost of repairs to or
replacements for the artificial members, braces, or prosthodontics that
result from a compensable injury pursuant to a prior award and are
required due to either medical necessity or normal wear and tear,
determined according to the employee's individual use, but not abuse,
of the artificial member, braces, or prosthodontics, shall be paid from
the second injury fund upon order or award of the worker's
compensation board. The employee is not required to meet any other
requirement for admission to the second injury fund.
(g) If an accident arising out of and in the course of employment
after June 30, 1997, results in the loss of or damage to an artificial
member, a brace, an implant, eyeglasses, prosthodontics, or other
medically prescribed device, the employer shall repair the artificial
member, brace, implant, eyeglasses, prosthodontics, or other medically
prescribed device or furnish an identical or a reasonably equivalent
replacement.
(h) This section may not be construed to prohibit an agreement
between an employer and the employer's employees that has the
approval of the board and that binds the parties to:
(1) medical care furnished by medical service providers selected
by agreement before or after injury; or
(2) the findings of a medical service provider who was chosen by
agreement.
SECTION 2. IC 22-3-7-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.275-2013,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) During the period of disablement, the
employer shall furnish or cause to be furnished, is responsible for
providing, free of charge to the employee, an attending physician for
2026 IN 1069—LS 6067/DI 153


the treatment of the employee's occupational disease, and in addition
thereto such the services and products as that the attending physician
or the worker's compensation board may deem necessary. After June
30, 2026, the employee is entitled to choose the attending physician
that the employer is required to provide, free of charge, regardless
of whether the occupational disease occurred before July 1, 2026.
If, due to the nature of the occupational disease, the employee is
unable to select an attending physician or does not select an
attending physician and the nature of the occupational disease
requires immediate treatment and care, the employer shall select
an attending physician for the employee as required or appropriate
to provide immediate treatment and care. The employer shall
provide or cause to be provided an attending physician during any
time that the employee has not chosen an attending physician.
When medically necessary or advisable, or at the request of the
employee, the attending physician shall consult with the employee's
personal physician. Notice that the employee has chosen an
attending physician and notice of the provision of services and
products as they occur shall be given to the employer and the
employer's insurance carrier as required under rules adopted by
the worker's compensation board. If the employee is requested or
required by the employer to submit to treatment outside the county of
employment, the employer shall also pay the reasonable expense of
travel, food, and lodging necessary during the travel, but not to exceed
the amount paid at the time of the travel by the state of Indiana to its
employees. If the treatment or travel to or from the place of treatment
causes a loss of working time to the employee, the employer shall
reimburse the employee for the loss of wages using the basis of the
employee's average daily wage.
(b) During the period of disablement resulting from the occupational
disease, the employer shall furnish is responsible for providing to the
employee, free of charge, such the physician, services and products,
and the worker's compensation board may, on proper application of
either party, require that treatment by such the physician and such the
services and products be furnished by or on behalf of the employer as
the board may deem reasonably necessary. After June 30, 2026, the
employee is entitled to choose the physician and obtain the services
and products that the chosen physician or the worker's
compensation board deem reasonably necessary, free of charge,
regardless of whether the occupational disease occurred before
July 1, 2026. The employer shall provide or cause to be provided
an attending physician during any time that the employee has not
2026 IN 1069—LS 6067/DI 153


chosen an attending physician. When medically necessary or
advisable, or at the request of the employee, the attending
physician shall consult with the employee's personal physician.
Notice that the employee has received physician services and
products chosen by the employee shall be given to the employer
and the employer's insurance carrier as required under the rules
of the worker's compensation board. After an employee's
occupational disease has been adjudicated by agreement or award on
the basis of permanent partial impairment and within the statutory
period for review in such case as provided in section 27(i) of this
chapter, the employer may continue to furnish a physician or a surgeon
and other services and products, and the board may, within such the
statutory period for review as provided in section 27(i) of this chapter,
on a proper application of either party, require that treatment by such
the physician or surgeon and such the services and products be
furnished by and on behalf of the employer as the board may deem
necessary to limit or reduce the amount and extent of such the
employee's impairment. If the employer chooses to continue
providing a physician or surgeon, after June 30, 2026, the employee
is entitled to choose the physician or surgeon and obtain the
services and products that the chosen physician or surgeon or the
worker's compensation board deem reasonably necessary,
regardless of whether the occupational disease occurred before
July 1, 2026. The employer may provide or cause to be provided
the physician or surgeon during any time that the employee has not
chosen an attending physician. When medically necessary or
advisable, or at the request of the employee, the attending
physician shall consult with the employee's personal physician.
Notice that the employee has received physician or surgeon
services and products chosen by the employee shall be given to the
employer and the employer's insurance carrier as required under
the rules of the worker's compensation board. The refusal of the
employee to accept such services and products when so provided by or
on behalf of the employer, shall bar the employee from all
compensation otherwise payable during the period of such refusal and
the employee's right to prosecute any proceeding under this chapter
shall be suspended and abated until such refusal ceases. The employee
must be served with a notice setting forth the consequences of the
refusal under this section. The notice must be in a form prescribed by
the worker's compensation board. No compensation for permanent total
impairment, permanent partial impairment, permanent disfigurement,
or death shall be paid or payable for that part or portion of such the
2026 IN 1069—LS 6067/DI 153


impairment, disfigurement, or death which is the result of the failure of
such the employee to accept such the services and products, provided
that an employer may at any time permit an employee to have treatment
for the employee's disease or injury by spiritual means or prayer in lieu
of such the physician, services and products.
(c) Regardless of when it occurs, where a compensable occupational
disease results in the amputation of a body part, the enucleation of an
eye, or the loss of natural teeth, the employer shall furnish an
appropriate artificial member, braces, and prosthodontics. The cost of
repairs to or replacements for the artificial members, braces, or
prosthodontics that result from a compensable occupational disease
pursuant to a prior award and are required due to either medical
necessity or normal wear and tear, determined according to the
employee's individual use, but not abuse, of the artificial member,
braces, or prosthodontics, shall be paid from the second injury fund
upon order or award of the worker's compensation board. The
employee is not required to meet any other requirement for admission
to the second injury fund.
(d) If an emergency or because of the employer's failure to provide
such the attending physician or such the services and products or such
the treatment by spiritual means or prayer as specified in this section,
or for other good reason, a physician other than that provided chosen
by the employee and not otherwise furnished by the employer treats
the diseased employee within the period of disability, or necessary and
proper services and products are procured within the period, the
reasonable cost of such the services and products shall, subject to
approval of the worker's compensation board, be paid by the employer.
(e) An employer or employer's insurance carrier may not delay the
provision of emergency medical care whenever emergency medical
care is considered necessary in the professional judgment of the
attending health care facility physician.
(f) This section may not be construed to prohibit an agreement
between an employer and employees that has the approval of the board
and that:
(1) binds the parties to medical care furnished by medical service
providers selected by agreement before or after disablement; or
(2) makes the findings of a medical service provider chosen in
this manner binding upon the parties.
(g) The employee and the employee's estate do not have liability to
a medical service provider for payment for services obtained under this
section. The right to order payment for all services provided under this
chapter is solely with the board. All claims by a medical service
2026 IN 1069—LS 6067/DI 153


provider for payment for services are against the employer and the
employer's insurance carrier, if any, and must be made with the board
under this chapter. After June 30, 2011, a medical service provider
must file an application for adjustment of a claim for a medical service
provider's fee with the board not later than two (2) years after the
receipt of an initial written communication from the employer, the
employer's insurance carrier, if any, or an agent acting on behalf of the
employer after the medical service provider submits a bill for services.
To offset a part of the board's expenses related to the administration of
medical service provider reimbursement disputes, a medical service
facility shall pay a filing fee of sixty dollars ($60) in a balance billing
case. The filing fee must accompany each application filed with the
board. If an employer, employer's insurance carrier, or an agent acting
on behalf of the employer denies or fails to pay any amount on a claim
submitted by a medical service facility, a filing fee is not required to
accompany an application that is filed for the denied or unpaid claim.
A medical service provider may combine up to ten (10) individual
claims into one (1) application whenever:
(1) all individual claims involve the same employer, insurance
carrier, or billing review service; and
(2) the amount of each individual claim does not exceed two
hundred dollars ($200).
SECTION 3. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) The worker's
compensation board of Indiana may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
to implement the amendments made by this act to IC 22-3-3-4 and
IC 22-3-7-17.
(b) This SECTION expires December 31, 2027.
SECTION 4. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1069—LS 6067/DI 153